Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5444XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 2123 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 724.33 Identification marks on 1 firearms ââ manufacturing firearms ââ penalties. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âAntique firearmâ means the same as the term is defined 4 in 18 U.S.C. Â§921. 5 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of public safety. 6 c. âFirearmâ means the same as the term is defined in 18 7 U.S.C. Â§921. 8 d. âManufactureâ means to fabricate or construct a firearm, 9 including the initial assembly. 10 e. âSecurity exemplarâ means the same as the term is defined 11 in 18 U.S.C. Â§922. 12 f. âUnfinished frame or lower receiverâ means a blank, 13 casting, or machined body intended to be turned into the frame 14 or lower receiver of a firearm, with additional machining, and 15 that has been formed or machined to the point at which most 16 major machining operations have been completed to turn the 17 blank, casting, or machined body into a frame or lower receiver 18 of a firearm, even if the fire control cavity area of such 19 blank, casting, or machined body is still completely solid 20 and unmachined. âUnfinished frame or lower receiverâ does not 21 include a firearm. 22 2. No later than December 1, 2026, the department, in 23 consultation with the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, 24 and explosives as necessary, shall develop and maintain a 25 system to distribute a unique serial number or other mark of 26 identification to any person requesting such number or mark 27 pursuant to subsection 4 or 5. The department shall provide 28 notice that the system is operational by posting a notification 29 on the departmentâs internet site and by electronically 30 notifying federally licensed firearms dealers. The department 31 shall maintain identifying information of the person requesting 32 the number or mark and of the firearm or unfinished frame or 33 lower receiver for which each number or mark is requested. 34 3. No person shall remove, deface, alter, or obliterate 35 -1- LSB 5444XS (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 7 S.F. 2123 the name of any maker or model, makerâs number, unique serial 1 number, or other mark of identification on any firearm. 2 The possession of any firearm upon which any identifying 3 mark, number, or name has been removed, defaced, altered, or 4 obliterated shall be prima facie evidence that the person 5 owning or in possession of such firearm has removed, defaced, 6 altered, or obliterated the identifying mark, number, or name. 7 4. a. A person shall not complete the manufacture of a 8 firearm without subsequently obtaining a unique serial number 9 or other mark of identification from the department pursuant 10 to paragraph âbâ and engraving upon or permanently affixing to 11 the firearm such serial number or other mark in a manner that 12 conforms with the requirements imposed on licensed importers 13 and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 14 Â§923(i) and any regulation adopted thereunder. 15 b. No later than thirty days after a person completes the 16 manufacture of a firearm, or ninety days after the department 17 provides notice pursuant to subsection 2, whichever date is 18 later, the person shall request a unique serial number or other 19 mark of identification by notifying the department of such 20 manufacture and providing any identifying information to the 21 department concerning the firearm and the owner of such firearm 22 in a manner prescribed by the department. Upon receiving 23 a properly submitted request for a unique serial number or 24 other mark of identification from a person who completes the 25 manufacture of a firearm, the department shall determine if 26 the person is prohibited from purchasing or possessing a 27 firearm. If the person is not prohibited from purchasing or 28 possessing a firearm, the department shall issue to the person 29 a unique serial number or other mark of identification no 30 later than three business days after the person makes such 31 request. Issuance of a unique serial number or other mark 32 of identification pursuant to this subsection shall not be 33 considered evidence that the firearm is otherwise lawfully 34 possessed. 35 -2- LSB 5444XS (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 7 S.F. 2123 c. A person shall not transfer to another person a firearm 1 manufactured in violation of this subsection. 2 d. A person shall not facilitate, aid, or abet the 3 manufacture of a firearm by a person or for a person who is 4 otherwise prohibited by law from purchasing or possessing a 5 firearm, or that a person is otherwise prohibited by law from 6 purchasing or possessing. 7 e. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the 8 manufacture of a firearm manufactured using an unfinished frame 9 or lower receiver on which a serial number or other identifying 10 mark has been engraved or permanently affixed pursuant to 11 subsection 5. 12 f. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to any of 13 the following: 14 (1) The manufacture of firearms by a federally licensed 15 firearms manufacturer. 16 (2) Any antique firearm or any firearm manufactured prior 17 to the effective date of this Act, provided such firearm is 18 otherwise lawfully possessed. 19 (3) The delivery or transfer of a firearm to a law 20 enforcement agency. 21 5. a. A person shall not sell, deliver, or otherwise 22 transfer an unfinished frame or lower receiver that does not 23 have a unique serial number or other mark of identification 24 obtained pursuant to the system developed in subsection 2. 25 b. A person may request a unique serial number or other mark 26 of identification for an unfinished frame or lower receiver 27 by providing any identifying information to the department 28 concerning the unfinished frame or lower receiver and the 29 owner of such unfinished frame or lower receiver in a manner 30 prescribed by the department. Upon receiving a properly 31 submitted request for a unique serial number or other mark 32 of identification for an unfinished frame or lower receiver, 33 the department shall determine if the person is prohibited 34 from purchasing or possessing a firearm. If the person is 35 -3- LSB 5444XS (3) 91 sb/js 3/ 7 S.F. 2123 not prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm, the 1 department shall issue to the person a unique serial number 2 or other mark of identification no later than three business 3 days after the person makes such request or ten days after the 4 department provides notice pursuant to subsection 2, whichever 5 date is later. 6 c. A unique serial number or other identifying mark obtained 7 pursuant to paragraph âbâ shall be engraved upon or permanently 8 affixed to the unfinished frame or lower receiver in a manner 9 that conforms with the requirements imposed on licensed 10 importers and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant to 18 11 U.S.C. Â§923(i) and any regulation adopted thereunder. 12 d. A person may arrange in advance to deliver and transfer 13 an unfinished frame or lower receiver to the department or to a 14 police department. 15 e. On or after December 1, 2026, a person shall not possess 16 an unfinished frame or lower receiver unless the person is 17 eligible to purchase and possess a firearm under state and 18 federal law. 19 f. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the 20 sale, delivery, or transfer of an unfinished frame or lower 21 receiver between any of the following: 22 (1) A federally licensed firearms manufacturer and a 23 federally licensed firearms dealer. 24 (2) A federally licensed firearms importer and a federally 25 licensed firearms dealer. 26 (3) Multiple federally licensed firearms dealers. 27 6. A person shall not manufacture any firearm from polymer 28 plastic that, after removal of grips, stocks, and magazines, 29 is not as detectable as a security exemplar by walk-through 30 metal detectors calibrated and operated to detect the security 31 exemplar. 32 7. a. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph âbâ , a 33 person who violates a provision of this section commits a class 34 âCâ felony. 35 -4- LSB 5444XS (3) 91 sb/js 4/ 7 S.F. 2123 b. A person who sells, delivers, or otherwise transfers 1 an unfinished frame or lower receiver in violation of the 2 provisions of this section knowing that such unfinished frame 3 or lower receiver is stolen or that the manufacturerâs number 4 or other mark of identification on such unfinished frame or 5 lower receiver has been altered, removed, or obliterated 6 commits a class âBâ felony. 7 c. Any firearm or unfinished frame or lower receiver 8 possessed in violation of a provision of this section shall be 9 forfeited to the department. 10